Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2523
Benefits.

The agreement creating a joint public agency may provide that insurance, retirement, indemnification, and other benefits be provided by one or more participating public agencies. If the agreement so provides, the insurance, retirement, indemnification, or other benefits applicable to the participating public agencies shall include the officers or employees of the joint public agency as provided in the agreement.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 23.